Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.187

Child forensic interviews—Audio/video recordings exempt from disclosure under public records act—Court order required for disclosure.

Any and all audio and video recordings of child forensic interviews as defined in this chapter are exempt from disclosure under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW. Such recordings are confidential under chapter 13.50 RCW and federal law and may only be disclosed pursuant to a court order entered upon a showing of good cause and with advance notice to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. However, if the child is an emancipated minor or has attained the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010, advance notice must be to the child. Failure to disclose an audio or video recording of a child forensic interview as defined in this chapter is not grounds for penalties or other sanctions available under chapter 42.56 RCW or RCW 13.50.100(10). Nothing in this section is intended to restrict the ability of the department or law enforcement to share child welfare information as authorized or required by state or federal law.

[ 2018 c 171 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 171: See note following RCW 26.44.188.